District of Columbia statutes.
2-1207.01

Repealed

Findings.

Repealed.

June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-89, § 2, 31 DCR 2514
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 7, 49 DCR 8140
1981 Ed., § 1-2211.
Transfer of powers, duties, and responsibilities from Board of Directors of Economic Development Finance Corporation: Section 30(b) of D.C. Law 12-144 provided for the transfer of the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Board of Directors of the Economic Development Finance Corporation to the Board of Directors of the National Capital Revitalization Corporation, and for the abolition of the Board of Directors of the Economic Development Finance Corporation.